Tennessee, session 114, HB2363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-1703, is amended by deleting
subsections (a) and (b) and substituting instead:
(a)
(1) The privilege tax established by this part is:
(A) For a person licensed or registered in a profession listed in § 67-
4-1702(1) or (2), four hundred dollars ($400) annually; and
(B) For a person licensed in the profession listed in § 67-4-1702(3),
two hundred dollars ($200) annually.
(2) The privilege tax is due and payable on June 1 of each year. Taxes
paid after June 1 are delinquent.
(b) A person who is licensed or registered for two (2) or more professions taxed
pursuant to this part is not required to pay more than one (1) tax:
(1) In the amount of four hundred dollars ($400) for a person licensed or
registered for two (2) or more professions listed in § 67-4-1702(1) or (2); or
(2) In the amount of two hundred dollars ($400) for a person licensed for
the profession listed in § 67-4-1702(3) and licensed or registered in one (1) or
more professions listed in § 67-4-1702(1) or (2).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to privilege taxes due and payable after May 31, 2027.
HB2363
010824
- 1 -